Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2423.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 63RESIDENTIAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTGRANT PROGRAMSec.6301. Definitions.6302. Residential Economic Development District Grant Program.6303. Submission to department.6304. Residential Economic Development District Fund.§ 6301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Residential Economic Development District Fund established under section 6304(a) (relating to Residential Economic Development District Fund)."Major economic development project." A project in this Commonwealth that meets both of the following criteria:(1) the project is reasonably expected to create, retain and attract jobs or otherwise improve the economic well-being of the area surrounding the project site; and(2) significant private investments are committed to establish, expand, renovate or occupy a facility as part of a single project at a designated project site, including investment in new buildings, additions or improvements to existing buildings, machinery, equipment, furniture, fixtures and inventory."Major workforce housing project." A project that creates a significant number of housing units."Pro-housing development policy." Any of the following:(1) Having a process in place to increase the rate at which permits for housing developments are reviewed.(2) Having a preapproval process in place for an expedited review of permits for a diverse range of housing developers.(3) Subsidizing or decreasing costs related to water or sewer connections and extensions for major workforce housing projects.(4) Acquiring and readying sites that are ready to be 20260HB2423PN3224 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financed and built upon by developers.(5) Reducing or eliminating impact, inspection and plan review fees for housing developers.(6) Adopting a zoning plan that includes promoting higher density, small lot size and minimum setback requirements.(7) Developing a comprehensive plan that promotes diverse residential development options.(8) Having no parking requirements for developments that include residential units.(9) Improving water or sewer infrastructure, improving roads or permitting both rigid and flexible pavement types.(10) Developing municipal and authority partnerships to expand the provision of sewer and water services to new areas.(11) Promoting the use of nontraditional building structures such as modular or manufactured homes.(12) Allowing accessory dwelling units as a matter of right.(13) Allowing for townhome, duplex, triplex and quadplex dwellings as a matter of right.(14) Eliminating height restrictions as a matter of right.(15) Facilitating construction workforce training, apprenticeships, tools, equipment and instructional materials, including transportation assistance and stipends.(16) Prioritizing municipal engineering review of subdivision, land development and infrastructure plans for housing development projects."Program." The Residential Economic Development District 20260HB2423PN3224 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Grant Program established under section 6302 (relating to Residential Economic Development District Grant Program)."Residential economic development district." All parcels of land proximate to a major economic development project.§ 6302. Residential Economic Development District Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Residential Economic Development District Grant Program is established within the department for the purpose of encouraging major workforce housing projects in areas of this Commonwealth that otherwise would not attract such developments and to increase home ownership among residents of this Commonwealth.(b) Applicants.--A county or municipal corporation that is fully or partially located within a residential economic development district may apply for a grant under the program.(c) Duties of department.-- The department may deny, withhold, suspend or recoup grant funds that do not adhere to this chapter.§ 6303. Submission to department.(a) Application.--A county or municipal corporation may submit an application independently or in collaboration with a housing developer or one or more other counties or municipal corporations. The application shall, at minimum, include documentation or other evidence that proves, to the satisfaction of the department, that the applicant has done or has imminent plans to do both of the following within the district:(1) adopt and implement, or demonstrate a documented commitment to adopt and implement, at least five pro-housing development policies that apply districtwide or municipality-wide; and20260HB2423PN3224 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) approve a major workforce housing project.(b) Award of grants.--The department, in coordination with local municipalities, shall review applications and award grants under the program on a rolling basis, to the extent that funds are available.(c) Determination.--The department shall evaluate applications and determine the amount of each grant awarded in accordance with scoring metrics that give preference to counties and municipal corporations that adopt pro-housing policies as provided under this chapter.(d) Limitations.--A grant recipient shall use the funds only for the following purposes:(1) Providing capital for housing development through grants or loans.(2) Acquiring and readying sites for development.(3) Providing financial assistance for housing-related infrastructure projects, including road improvements and water or sewer connections.(4) Addressing additional human services or public safety needs due to increases in population.(5) Building capacity at the municipal or regional level to support the planning, application, administration and implementation of grant-funded housing and infrastructure projects, including technical assistance, grant writing, program administration and assistance provided by housing coalitions, redevelopment authorities or other qualified entities.(6) Any other purpose deemed appropriate by the department in keeping with the intent of this chapter, including traffic infrastructure, school infrastructure, 20260HB2423PN3224 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recreation centers and health care needs.(e) Use of grant funds.--Grant funds shall be used solely for purposes authorized under this chapter.(f) Other department grants.--Adoption of pro-housing policies under this chapter shall be considered by the department in awarding other department grants that seek to further residential housing development or related infrastructure projects.(g) Eligible housing developers.--Eligible housing developers shall include for-profit developers, nonprofit housing developers and nonprofit supportive housing developers.(h) Eligibility for additional grants.--(1) Receipt of grant funds under the program shall not disqualify a project from eligibility for any other grant programs.(2) The department shall encourage projects located within a residential economic development district that receive Redevelopment Assistance Capital Program funding and include a residential component to incorporate workforce housing units or other workforce housing accommodations.§ 6304. Residential Economic Development District Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Residential Economic Development District Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of providing grants under section 6302 (relating to Residential Economic Development District Grant Program).(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund shall be appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose under subsection (a).(c) Administrative expenses.--Administrative expenses of the 20260HB2423PN3224 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department related to the program may not exceed 5% of money in the fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2423PN3224 - 7 - 123